Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.258

[Art. 26a] Military judges—Qualifications.

A military judge must be a judge advocate. The adjutant general shall prescribe procedures for certifying, appointing, detailing, and removing military judges.

[ 2009 c 378 s 6.]